Washington statutes.
RCW 36.54.180

County ferry districts—Not subject to Washington utilities and transportation commission.

A ferry district is exempt from the provisions of Title 81 RCW and is not subject to the control of the Washington utilities and transportation commission. It is not necessary for a ferry district to apply for a certificate of public convenience and necessity.

[ 2003 c 83 s 308.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Captions, part headings not law—Severability—Effective date—2003 c 83: See notes following RCW 36.57A.200.